Illinois, session 104th, HB3773.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Section 3-4-1 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/3-4-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-4-1)7    Sec. 3-4-1. Gifts and Grants; Special Trusts Funds; 8Department of Corrections Reimbursement and Education Fund.9    (a) The Department may accept, receive and use, for and in 10behalf of the State, any moneys, goods or services given for 11general purposes of this Code by the federal government or 12from any other source, public or private, including 13collections from inmates, reimbursement of payments under the 14Workers' Compensation Act, and commissions from inmate collect 15call telephone systems under an agreement with the Department 16of Central Management Services. For these purposes the 17Department may comply with such conditions and enter into such 18agreements upon such covenants, terms, and conditions as the 19Department may deem necessary or desirable, if the agreement 20is not in conflict with State law.21    (a-5) The Department of Central Management Services shall 22contract with a qualified vendor for telephone services in 23which the cost of the service is not based on the number of   HB3773- 2 -LRB104 09839 RLC 19907 b1telephone calls made. A committed person is entitled to make 2free telephone calls from the correctional institution or 3facility. Neither the Department of Corrections nor its agents 4may adopt rules that charge a committed person per telephone 5call made. The Department of Corrections shall adopt rules 6determining the length of each call made by a committed 7person, how many times each day a committed person may make 8telephone calls, and may prohibit calls for illegal purposes. 9Beginning January 1, 2018, the Department of Central 10Management Services shall contract with the qualified vendor 11who proposes the lowest per minute rate not exceeding 7 cents 12per minute for debit, prepaid, collect calls and who does not 13bill to any party any tax, service charge, or additional fee 14exceeding the per minute rate, including, but not limited to, 15any per call surcharge, account set up fee, bill statement 16fee, monthly account maintenance charge, or refund fee as 17established by the Federal Communications Commission Order for 18state prisons in the Matter of Rates for Interstate Inmate 19Calling Services, Second Report and Order, WC Docket 12-375, 20FCC 15-136 (adopted Oct. 22, 2015). Telephone services made 21available through a prepaid or collect call system shall 22include international calls; those calls shall be made 23available at reasonable rates subject to Federal 24Communications Commission rules and regulations, but not to 25exceed 23 cents per minute. Public Act 99-878 applies to any 26new or renewal contract for inmate calling services.   HB3773- 3 -LRB104 09839 RLC 19907 b1    (b) The Department of Corrections Reimbursement and 2Education Fund is hereby created as a special fund in the State 3Treasury. The moneys deposited into the Department of 4Corrections Reimbursement and Education Fund shall be 5appropriated to the Department of Corrections for the expenses 6of the Department.7    The following shall be deposited into the Department of 8Corrections Reimbursement and Education Fund:9        (i) Moneys received or recovered by the Department of 10    Corrections as reimbursement for expenses incurred for the 11    incarceration of committed persons.12        (ii) Moneys received or recovered by the Department as 13    reimbursement of payments made under the Workers' 14    Compensation Act.15        (iii) Moneys received by the Department as commissions 16    from inmate collect call telephone systems.17        (iv) Moneys received or recovered by the Department as 18    reimbursement for expenses incurred by the employment of 19    persons referred to the Department as participants in the 20    federal Job Training Partnership Act programs.21        (v) Federal moneys, including reimbursement and 22    advances for services rendered or to be rendered and 23    moneys for other than educational purposes, under grant or 24    contract.25        (vi) Moneys identified for deposit into the Fund under 26    Section 13-44.4 of the School Code.  HB3773- 4 -LRB104 09839 RLC 19907 b1        (vii) (Blank).2    (c) The Department of Juvenile Justice Reimbursement and 3Education Fund is created as a special fund in the State 4Treasury. The moneys deposited into the Department of Juvenile 5Justice Reimbursement Fund and Education shall be appropriated 6to the Department of Juvenile Justice for the expenses of the 7Department. The following moneys shall be deposited into the 8Department of Juvenile Justice Reimbursement Fund and 9Education Fund:10        (i) received or recovered by the Department of 11    Juvenile Justice as reimbursement for expenses incurred 12    for the incarceration of committed youth;13        (ii) received or recovered by the Department as 14    reimbursement of payments made under the Workers' 15    Compensation Act;16        (iii) received or recovered by the Department as 17    reimbursement for expenses incurred by the employment of 18    persons referred to the Department as participants in the 19    federal Job Training Partnership Act programs;20        (iv) federal moneys, including reimbursement and 21    advances for services rendered or to be rendered and 22    moneys for other than educational purposes, under grant or 23    contract; and24        (v) moneys identified for deposit into the Fund under 25    Section 13-44.6 of the School Code. 26(Source: P.A. 102-350, eff. 8-13-21; 102-699, eff. 7-1-22;   HB3773- 5 -LRB104 09839 RLC 19907 b1103-616, eff. 7-1-24.)